Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 49 Electronic Mail Fraud

6-49-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Electronic Mail Fraud Regulatory Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 628, § 1.

6-49-2.
Legislative findings.

It is hereby found and declared as follows:

Consumers are bombarded with electronic communications, often times in a fraudulent attempt to solicit personal and private information. In the interest of protecting the citizens of Rhode Island, it is imperative that the general assembly establish safeguards against such practices. Notwithstanding any provision of the general or public law, rule, or regulation, the general assembly shall establish regulations pertaining to the prevention of electronic mail fraud.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 628, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 36.

6-49-3.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings:

“Assist the transmission” means actions taken by a person to provide substantial assistance or support that enables any person to formulate, compose, send, originate, initiate, or transmit a commercial electronic mail message or a commercial electronic text message when the person providing the assistance knows that the initiator of the commercial electronic mail message or the commercial electronic text message is engaged, or intends to engage, in any practice that violates the consumer protection act.

“Commercial electronic mail message” means an electronic mail message sent for the purpose of promoting real property, goods, or services for sale or lease. It does not mean an electronic mail message to which an interactive computer service provider has attached an advertisement in exchange for free use of an electronic mail account when the sender has agreed to such an arrangement.

“Commercial electronic text message” means an electronic text message sent to promote real property, goods, or services for sale or lease.

“Electronic mail address” means a destination, commonly expressed as a string of characters, to which electronic mail may be sent or delivered.

“Electronic mail message” means an electronic message sent to an electronic mail address and a reference to an internet domain, whether or not displayed, to which an electronic mail message can be sent or delivered.

“Electronic text message” means a text message sent to a cellular telephone or pager equipped with short message service or any similar capability, whether the message is initiated as a short message service message or as an electronic mail message.

“Initiate the transmission” refers to the action by the original sender of an electronic mail message or an electronic text message, not to the action by any intervening, interactive computer service or wireless network that may handle or retransmit the message, unless such intervening, interactive computer service assists in the transmission of an electronic mail message when it knows that the person initiating the transmission is engaged, or intends to engage, in any act or practice that violates the consumer protection act.

“Interactive computer service” means any information service, system, or access software provider that provides or enables computer access by multiple users to a computer server, including, specifically, a service or system that provides access to the internet and such systems operated or services offered by libraries or educational institutions.

“Internet” means collectively the myriad of computer and telecommunications facilities, including equipment and operating software, that comprise the interconnected worldwide network of networks that employ the transmission control protocol/internet protocol, or any predecessor or successor protocols, to such protocol, to communicate information of all kinds by wire or radio.

“Internet domain name” refers to globally unique, hierarchical reference to an internet host or service, assigned through centralized, internet naming authorities, comprising a series of character strings separated by periods, with the right-most string specifying the top of the hierarchy.

“Person” means a person, corporation, partnership, or association.

“Personally identifying information” means an individual’s: (i) social security number; (ii) driver’s license number; (iii) bank account number; (iv) credit or debit card number; (v) personal identification number; (vi) automated or electronic signature; (vii) unique biometric data; (viii) account passwords; or (ix) any other piece of information that can be used to access an individual’s financial accounts or to obtain goods or services.

“Web page” means a location, with respect to the world wide web, that has a single, uniform, resource locator, or other single location with respect to the internet.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 628, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 36.

6-49-4.
Prohibited activity.

No person may solicit, request, or take any action to induce another person to provide personally identifying information by means of a web page, electronic mail message, or otherwise using the internet in a manner as previously defined in §

6-49-3

by representing oneself, either directly or by implication, to be a business or individual without the authority or approval of such business or individual. No person may conspire with another person to engage in any act that violates the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 628, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 36.

6-49-5.
Damages.

Damages to a consumer resulting from the practices prohibited by this chapter are up to five hundred dollars ($500) per violation, or actual damages, whichever is greater.

A person engaged in the business of providing internet access service to the public; an owner of a web page; or trademark owner adversely affected by reason of a violation of this chapter, may bring an action against a person who violates this chapter to:

Enjoin further violations of this chapter; and

Recover the greater of actual damages or five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation of this chapter.

The court may increase the damages up to three (3) times the damages allowed by this section if the defendant has engaged in a pattern and practice of violating this chapter. The court may award costs and reasonable attorneys’ fees to a prevailing party.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 628, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 36.

6-49-6.
Severability.

If any of the provisions of this chapter, or the application of any provision to any person or circumstance, shall be held invalid, the remainder of this chapter, or the application of the provisions to persons or circumstances other than those to which it is held invalid, shall not be affected thereby.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 628, § 1.